Mississippi statutes. Title 21. Municipalities
Chapter 47. Delta Natural Gas District

§ 21-47-1.
Use of surplus funds from operation of systems.

The Delta Natural Gas District of Humphreys and Sunflower Counties having acquired certain funds from the operation of its systems is hereby authorized, in its discretion, to use surplus funds for further development of the district and to distribute a portion thereof to the City of Inverness, Town of Isola and the City of Belzoni, which municipalities compose the district.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1988, ch. 455, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved April 26, 1988).

§ 21-47-3.
Use of funds, generally.

The Delta Natural Gas District shall devote all monies, derived from any source other than the issuance of bonds for purposes authorized by the laws of the State of Mississippi, to or for the payment of all operating expenses, including such items as are normally required of utilities for sales development; to or for the payment of all bonds and interest on outstanding revenue bonds, if any, of such systems; to or for the acquisition and improvement of the system contingencies; to or for the payment of all other obligations incurred in the operation and maintenance of the systems and the furnishing of service; to or for the creation and maintenance of a cash working fund or a surplus fund to be used for replacement, extension of systems and emergencies. The balance of the revenues of the systems, as such may be determined by the directors of the district may be used for any other lawful district purpose or may be paid to the governing authorities of the municipalities of Inverness, Isola and Belzoni, in the proportion determined by vote of the directors of the district for distribution by the municipalities to the various municipal funds and used by each municipality for any municipal purpose authorized by law.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1988, ch. 455, § 2, eff from and after passage (approved April 26, 1988).

§ 21-47-5.
Sale of district’s assets to public utility; purchase price.

The district shall be authorized to convey the assets of the district to any suitable public utility qualified to operate same, authorized for such service by the State of Mississippi, and regulated by the regulatory agencies of the State of Mississippi. The sale price shall be such as shall be agreed upon between the district and the purchasing utility. The purchase price shall be used as follows:

First, the retirement of all bonds of the district.

The payment of all debts or obligations of the district.

The balance shall be deposited in banks or other financial institutions authorized to receive deposits of such funds by the laws of the State of Mississippi. Such deposits shall be made in accordance with, and shall be secured as required by, the laws of the State of Mississippi. Preference may be given to such institutions as may be located within the counties of Humphreys or Sunflower. Such deposit or deposits, and interest thereon, may be used as set out in Section 21-47-3.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1988, ch. 455, § 3, eff from and after passage (approved April 26, 1988).